Utah statutes.
63B-11-110.   Investment of sinking fund money.
(1)  The state treasurer may, by following the procedures and requirements of
Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act, invest any money contained in
the sinking fund until it is needed for the purposes for which the fund is
created.
(2)  Unless otherwise provided in the resolution of the commission authorizing
the issuance of bonds under this chapter, the treasurer shall retain all
income from the investment of any money contained in the sinking fund in the
sinking fund and use it for the payment of debt service on the bonds.
